District of Columbia statutes.
29-1007.03

Duration of marketing contract.

The initial duration of a marketing contract shall not exceed 10 years, but the contract may be self-renewing for additional periods not exceeding 5 years each. Unless the contract provides for another manner or time for termination, either party may terminate the contract by giving notice in a record at least 90 days before the end of the current term.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 703 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition

Editor's Notes